src/morphology/stems/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
bieđut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bieđuh FARGAT ;
ceakkonjuolgat:ceakko7#njuolg CAVGAT ;
dielvvis:diel'vi BOARIS ;
doavkkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:doav'kas DILDDAS ;
máilmmidovddus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:má#ilmmi#dov'dus GAPPUS ;
dumsui:dumso JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
dávggas:dáv'gas EATTAS ;
ealus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eallus BIEKKUS ;
ekspressiiva:eks^pressij'va AKTIIVA ;
fargat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fargad FARGAT ;
faŋkkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:faŋ'kas BOAKKAS ;
galššas:gal'ša GARAS ;
gavvar:gav'var CIENAL ;
geahppat:geahpp LOSSAT ;
gearggus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gear'gus GEARGGUS "ready A" ;
gielddus:giel'dus GEARGGUS ;
givas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:givvas EATTAS ;
goahkkái:goahkká JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
gonagasivdnenjuolgat:gonagas#ivdne#njuolg CAVGAT ;
groavis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:groavv SUVRRIS ;
guohca:guohccag8 GUOHCA ;
guoibmái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guojbmá JIEDNAI ;
guoros:guorro7s GUOROS ;
gáiddus:gáj'dus GAPPUS ;
gálggus:gál'gus NUOLUS ;
gálššas:gál'ša GARAS ;
gárvvis+Err/Sub:gar'vi BOARIS ;
gávkkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gáv'kas EATTAS ;
heahkas:heahkka HEAHKAS "surprising A" ;
huvlla:huv'lag8 GUOHCA ;
háissas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:háj'sa HEAHKAS ;
hánis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hátnis VATTIS ;
iešsihkar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ieš#sihkar CIENAL ;
individuella:individu^el'la AKTIIVA ;
itkkus:it'kus BIEKKUS ;
ivdnenjuolgat:ivdne#njuolg CAVGAT ;
jierbmái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jierbmá JIEDNAI ;
juorbbas:juor'bas EATTAS ;
jámmis:jám'm LINIS ;
knáhpis:knáhppi HEAHKAS ;
kroavis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:kroavv SUVRRIS ;
kuonna:kuon'nag8 GUOHCA ;
lavttis:lak'tis BOAKKAS ;
libmii:libme VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
liekkus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lieggus LIEKKUS "warm A" ;
linis:litn LINIS ;
lokála:lokála AKTIIVA ;
lossat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:loss LOSSAT ;
luotkkus:luot'kus GEARGGUS ;
luovos+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luovvo7s GUOROS ;
láittas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:láj'tas DILDDAS ;
láskkonjuolgat:láskko7#njuolg CAVGAT ;
meađmma:meađmmag8 GUOHCA ;
mieiggus:miej'gus BIEKKUS ;
moallái:moallá JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
nanus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nannu NANUS ;
njuoras+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njuorra NJUORAS "tender A" ;
nollas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nol'las BOAKKAS ;
nuolus:nuollus NUOLUS ;
nálggas:nál'ga HEAHKAS ;
námas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:námmas DILDDAS ;
oaivilámis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oaivi7#lápmis VATTIS ;
ortodoksa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ortodoksa AKTIIVA; !
ođas:ođđa GARAS ;
roattus+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roaddus LIEKKUS ;
roavis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roavv LINIS ;
roavis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:roavv SUVRRIS ; !Lene la den til, finnes slik i korp og på internet
romis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ropmi BOARIS ;
rossái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rossá JIEDNAI ;
ruhtahánis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruhta#hátnis VATTIS ;
ruojus:ruod'jus NUOLUS ;
ruŋkkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruŋ'kas GAPPUS ;
ruškesránis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruškes#rátni BOARIS_NOCOMP ;
rábmii:rábme VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
ráđas:ráđđa NJUORAS ;
ráđus:ráđđus GEARGGUS ;
sealbbus:seal'bus NUOLUS ;
silbaránis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:silba#rátni BOARIS_NOCOMP ;
siđŋŋas:siđgŋas BOAKKAS ;
skieras+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skierras EATTAS ;
skárppis:skár'p LINIS ;
sneavvar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sneav'var CIENAL ;
snoakkis:snoaggi HEAHKAS ;
snuolggas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:snuol'ga GARAS ;
soahtelámis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:soahte7#lápmis VATTIS ;
sreaŋggis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sreaŋ'g LINIS ;
stoaiddas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stoaj'da NJUORAS ;
stávrras+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stáv'ras BOAKKAS ;
sudnii:sudne VUDDJII_DECLINED ;
suhppái:suhppá JIEDNAI_DECLINED ;
suovat:suovad FARGAT ;
suvrris:suv'r SUVRRIS ;
hubmái+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hubmá JIEDNAI ;
vilddus:vil'dus BIEKKUS ;
viŋkilnjuolgat:viŋkil#njuolg CAVGAT ;
vuddjii:vuddje VUDDJII_DECLINED "fat A" ;
vuogas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuoh'kas VUOGAS ;
vuoitosihkar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuoito#sihkkar CIENAL ;
vuonjas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuonjas DILDDAS ;
vuostedoaris:vuoste7#doarri BOARIS ;
vádjit:vádjig DILDDAS ;
várddus+Err/Sub:vár'dus LIEKKUS ;
ásppas:ás'pas GAPPUS ;
čahkas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čahkka NJUORAS ;
čielggas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čiel'ga GARAS ;
čivrra:čiv0rag8 GUOHCA ;
čálggas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čál'ga NJUORAS ;
jiešsihkar+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jieš#sihkar CIENAL ;
rámis:rápmi RAMIS ; !funnet i korpus
